New Jersey, session 222, A2157.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2023, c.74, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, there is appropriated from the General Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 54 DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES 20 Physical and Mental Health 24 Special Health Service 7540 Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services GRANTS-IN-AID 22-7540  General Medical Services ................................... $3,600,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, Special Health Services ................................... $3,600,000 Grants-in-Aid: 22   Medical Coverage  Community-Based Long Term Care Recipients........................................... ($3,600,000) 2.    The following language provision in section 1 of P.L.2023, c.74, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, is amended to read as follows: 54 DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES 20 Physical and Mental Health 24 Special Health Service 7540 Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services GRANTS-IN-AID Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated within the General Medical Services program classification for medical day care services shall be conditioned upon the following provision: the minimum fee-for-service and managed care per diem reimbursement rates for adult medical day care providers shall be [$89.55] $93.10. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT This FY 2024 supplemental appropriation provides $3.6 million to the Department of Human Services to increase the adult medical day care Medicaid per diem rate by four percent from $89.55 to $93.10.  Adult medical day care services provide medically necessary services in an ambulatory care setting to individuals who are nonresidents of the facility, and who, due to their physical or cognitive impairment, require such services in order to live in the community. Under the annual Appropriations Act, the adult medical day care per diem rate was increased from $78.50 to $82 in FY 2021, from $82 to $86.10 in FY 2022, and from $86.10 to the current rate, $89.55, in FY 2024. Prior to these increases, the per diem rate was static at $78.50 since FY 2012. Despite these rate changes, the financial consequences of the COVID-19 pandemic have forced many providers of adult medical day care services to close their centers due to a reduction in income.  It is the sponsors goal that this additional funding will stabilize these essential service providers in order to ensure that New Jerseys most vulnerable residents can access the medical supports they need to continue to thrive in a community setting.